Hawaii statutes.
§354D-4 Powers and duties of the director.
Under the supervision of the director or the director's designee, the
administrator of the correctional industries program shall:

(1) Develop programs generating revenue that best
sustains their operation and allows for capital investment, and reimburses the
general fund, when possible, for the expense of correctional services;

(2) Develop programs providing the maximum level of
work and training opportunities for qualified, able-bodied inmates;

(3) Develop programs assuming responsibility for
training qualified, able-bodied inmates in general work and specific training
skills that increase their employment prospects after release;

(4) Develop programs in which inmates can learn
skills used in the construction and other industries, while providing low-cost
construction, renovation, and repairs of facilities, grounds, furniture,
vehicles, and equipment for private, nonprofit social services, health, or
education agencies and programs;

(5) Acquire or purchase equipment, materials,
supplies, office space, insurance, and services necessary to establish and
maintain programs pursuant to this chapter;

(6) Use labor services of qualified, able-bodied
inmates in the manufacture or production of goods and services that are needed
for the construction, operation, or maintenance of any office, department,
institution, or agency supported in whole or in part by the State, the
counties, or the federal government;

(7) Sell all goods and services to the State, the
counties, or the federal government;

(8) Sell uniforms and uniform accessories to state-employed
adult corrections officers;

(9) Purchase, lease, trade, exchange, acquire, and
maintain personal property; and

(10) Accept grants or loans from the State, the counties,
or the federal government. [L 1990, c 341, pt of §1; am L 1991, c 256, §2; am L
Sp 1993, c 8, §54; am L 2004, c 216, §39; am L 2007, c 19, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next